Louisiana, session 2026, SB195.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1133.4(A)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
40:1133.19 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1133.4. Powers and duties of the commission; exceptions
A. The commission shall:
* * *
(2) Approve requirements and standards of practice submitted by the bureau
for emergency medical personnel consistent with this Part. These requirements and
standards shall include the authority for licensed emergency medical
technicians, licensed advanced emergency medical technicians, and licensed
paramedics to administer patient-carried, time-critical prescription medication
to patients with rare diseases, chronic illnesses, and special medical needs in
accordance with R.S. 40:1133.19.
* * *
§1133.19. Administration of patient-carried, time-critical medication;
authority; liability
A. A licensed emergency medical technician, licensed advanced
emergency medical technician, or licensed paramedic may administer
patient-carried, time-critical prescription medication, to patients with rare
diseases, chronic illnesses, and special medical needs at the request of the
patient or patient's family and in accordance with protocols established by the
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 195 ENROLLED
EMS practitioner's EMS medical director.
B. Medications administered pursuant to this Section shall be limited to
intranasal, intravenous, and intramuscular medications.
C. A licensed emergency medical technician, licensed advanced
emergency medical technician, or licensed paramedic that administers a
patient-carried, time-critical prescription medication at the request of the
patient or patient's family member as provided for in this Section shall be
immune from civil liability, criminal prosecution, or disciplinary or other
adverse action under any professional licensing statute for any outcomes
resulting from the administration of the medication, unless personal injury
results from the gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct of the
practitioner administering the medication.
Section 2. This Act shall be known and may be cited as "The Danny's Dose EMS
Treatment Act".
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.